dictionaries/ennl.aff
FLAG long
SFX i Y 66
SFX i 0 dness e 
SFX i 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX i y iedness [^aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i 0 dnesses e 
SFX i 0 bednesses [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 kednesses [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 dednesses [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 fednesses [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 gednesses [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 kednesses [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 lednesses [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 mednesses [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 nednesses [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 pednesses [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 rednesses [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 sednesses [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 tednesses [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 vednesses [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 zednesses [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX i y iednesses [^aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 ednesses [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 ednesses [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i 0 dness's e 
SFX i 0 bedness's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 kedness's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 dedness's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 fedness's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 gedness's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 kedness's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 ledness's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 medness's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 nedness's [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 pedness's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 redness's [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 sedness's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 tedness's [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 vedness's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 zedness's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 edness's [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX i y iedness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness's [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX T Y 42
SFX T 0 r e 
SFX T 0 st e
SFX T 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX T 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX T 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX T 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX T 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX T 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX T 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX T 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX T 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX T 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX T 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX T 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX T 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX T 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX T y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX T y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX T 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R Y 72
SFX R 0 r e 
SFX R 0 rs e 
SFX R 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 ers [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rers [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX R y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 r's e 
SFX R 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er's [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 rer's [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX r Y 24
SFX r 0 r e 
SFX r 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 rs e 
SFX r 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 r's e 
SFX r 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [^ecly] 
SFX S Y 9
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 s [aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 es [sxz] 
SFX S 0 es [cs]h 
SFX S 0 s [^cs]h 
SFX S 0 s [ae]u 
SFX S 0 x [ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [^ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX P Y 9
SFX P y iness [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness [^y] 
SFX P y inesses [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 nesses [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 nesses [^y] 
SFX P y iness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness's [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness's [^y]  
SFX m Y 20
SFX m 0 sman [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman's [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen's [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 Y 20
SFX 5 0 swoman [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 6 Y 3
SFX 6 y iful [^aeiou]y 
SFX 6 0 ful [aeiou]y 
SFX 6 0 ful [^y] 
SFX j Y 3
SFX j y ifully [^aeiou]y 
SFX j 0 fully [aeiou]y 
SFX j 0 fully [^y] 
SFX p Y 5
SFX p y iless [^aeiou]y 
SFX p 0 less [aeiou]y 
SFX p 0 ess ll 
SFX p 0 less [^l]l 
SFX p 0 less [^ly] 
SFX Q Y 44
SFX Q 0 tise a 
SFX Q e ise [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilise [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ise [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ise um 
SFX Q 0 ise [^u]m 
SFX Q s se is 
SFX Q 0 ise [^i]s 
SFX Q y ise [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ise [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ise [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tises a 
SFX Q e ises [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilises [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ises [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ises um 
SFX Q 0 ises [^u]m 
SFX Q s ses is 
SFX Q 0 ises [^i]s 
SFX Q y ises [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ises [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ises [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tised a 
SFX Q e ised [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilised [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ised [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ised um 
SFX Q 0 ised [^u]m 
SFX Q s sed is 
SFX Q 0 ised [^i]s 
SFX Q y ised [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ised [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ised [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 tising a 
SFX Q e ising [^l]e 
SFX Q le ilising [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q e ising [aeiou]le 
SFX Q um ising um 
SFX Q 0 ising [^u]m 
SFX Q s sing is 
SFX Q 0 ising [^i]s 
SFX Q y ising [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ising [aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ising [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 Y 44
SFX 8 0 tize a 
SFX 8 e ize [^l]e 
SFX 8 le ilize [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 e ize [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 um ize um 
SFX 8 0 ize [^u]m 
SFX 8 s ze is 
SFX 8 0 ize [^i]s 
SFX 8 y ize [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ize [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ize [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 tizes a 
SFX 8 e izes [^l]e 
SFX 8 le ilizes [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 e izes [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 um izes um 
SFX 8 0 izes [^u]m 
SFX 8 s zes is 
SFX 8 0 izes [^i]s 
SFX 8 y izes [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izes [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izes [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 tized a 
SFX 8 e ized [^l]e 
SFX 8 le ilized [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 e ized [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 um ized um 
SFX 8 0 ized [^u]m 
SFX 8 s zed is 
SFX 8 0 ized [^i]s 
SFX 8 y ized [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ized [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ized [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 tizing a 
SFX 8 e izing [^l]e 
SFX 8 le ilizing [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 e izing [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 um izing um 
SFX 8 0 izing [^u]m 
SFX 8 s zing is 
SFX 8 0 izing [^i]s 
SFX 8 y izing [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izing [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izing [^aemsy] 
SFX q Y 22
SFX q 0 tisation a 
SFX q e isation [^l]e 
SFX q le ilisation [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e isation [aeiou]le 
SFX q um isation um 
SFX q 0 isation [^u]m 
SFX q s sation is 
SFX q 0 isation [^i]s 
SFX q y isation [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 tisations a 
SFX q e isations [^l]e 
SFX q le ilisations [^aeiou]le 
SFX q e isations [aeiou]le 
SFX q um isations um 
SFX q 0 isations [^u]m 
SFX q s sations is 
SFX q 0 isations [^i]s 
SFX q y isations [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isations [aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isations [^aemsy] 
SFX - Y 22
SFX - 0 tization a 
SFX - e ization [^l]e 
SFX - le ilization [^aeiou]le 
SFX - e ization [aeiou]le 
SFX - um ization um 
SFX - 0 ization [^u]m 
SFX - s zation is 
SFX - 0 ization [^i]s 
SFX - y ization [^aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 ization [aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 ization [^aemsy] 
SFX - 0 tizations a 
SFX - e izations [^l]e 
SFX - le ilizations [^aeiou]le 
SFX - e izations [aeiou]le 
SFX - um izations um 
SFX - 0 izations [^u]m 
SFX - s zations is 
SFX - 0 izations [^i]s 
SFX - y izations [^aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 izations [aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 izations [^aemsy] 
SFX s Y 33
SFX s 0 tiser a 
SFX s e iser [^l]e 
SFX s le iliser [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e iser [aeiou]le 
SFX s um iser um 
SFX s 0 iser [^u]m 
SFX s s ser is 
SFX s 0 iser [^i]s 
SFX s y iser [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tisers a 
SFX s e isers [^l]e 
SFX s le ilisers [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e isers [aeiou]le 
SFX s um isers um 
SFX s 0 isers [^u]m 
SFX s s sers is 
SFX s 0 isers [^i]s 
SFX s y isers [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 isers [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 isers [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 tiser's a 
SFX s e iser's [^l]e 
SFX s le iliser's [^aeiou]le 
SFX s e iser's [aeiou]le 
SFX s um iser's um 
SFX s 0 iser's [^u]m 
SFX s s ser's is 
SFX s 0 iser's [^i]s 
SFX s y iser's [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser's [aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser's [^aemsy] 
